District of Columbia statutes.
38-2907.01

DCPS budget.

(a)

The annual operating budget for DCPS shall:

(1)

Allocate no more than 5% of its gross budget to central administration;

(2)

Provide each school with not less than 95% of its prior year allocation of Formula funds, excluding those Formula funds directed to a school pursuant to paragraph (3) of this section; provided, that a school may receive less than 95% of such funds if that school is eliminating one or more grade levels offered at the school, faces a budgetary reduction due to the closing or consolidation of one school into another, or is undergoing a substantial instructional or programmatic change and the Chancellor includes in the budget submission to the Council a written justification for the greater than 5% reduction; provided further, that this paragraph shall not apply if the total Formula allocation to DCPS, excluding those Formula funds generated pursuant to § 38-2905.01, is reduced by more than 5% from its prior year allocation; and

(3)

Direct no less than 90% of the funds allocated to DCPS pursuant to § 38-2905.01 to school-level budgets and distribute such funds to schools proportionally based upon the number of at-risk students within each school’s projected student count.

(b)

(1)

Funds provided to schools pursuant to subsection (a)(3) of this section shall be available for school utilization at the direction of the Chancellor in consultation with the principal and local school advisory team, for the purpose of improving student achievement among at-risk students. By October 1 of each year, the Chancellor shall make publicly available an annual report that explains the allocation of funds sorted by individual schools.

(2)

Repealed.

(3)

Funds allocated pursuant to subsection (a)(3) of this section shall be supplemental to the school’s gross budget and shall not supplant any Formula, federal, or other funds to which the school is entitled.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-207, § 108a
as added Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-87, § 4(c), 61 DCR 309
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 4092, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4092 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the At-Risk Funding Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-13, Mar. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 3841, 21 DCSTAT 840).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the At-Risk Funding Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-7, June 4, 2015, 62 DCR 4564).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 rewrote (b)(1); and repealed (b)(2).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-87 added this section.
This section is referenced in § 38-2831.